Utah statutes.
9-7-215.   Internet and online access policy required.

(1)  As used in this section:

(a)  "Child pornography" is as defined in Section 76-5a-2.

(b)  "Harmful to minors" is as defined in Section 76-10-1201.

(c)  "Obscene" is as defined in 20 U.S.C. Sec. 9101.

(d)  "Technology protection measure" means a technology that blocks or filters Internet access to visual depictions.

(2)  State funds may not be provided to any public library that offers use of the Internet or an online service to the public unless the library:

(a) (i)  has in place a policy of Internet safety for minors including the operation of a technology protection measure:

(A)  with respect to any publicly accessible computer with Internet access; and

(B)  that protects against access to visual depictions that are:

(I)  child pornography;

(II)  harmful to minors; or

(III)  obscene; and

(ii)  is enforcing the operation of the technology protection measure described in Subsection (2)(a)(i) during any use of a computer by a minor; and

(b) (i)  has in place a policy of Internet safety including the operation of a technology protection measure:

(A)  with respect to any publicly accessible computer with Internet access; and

(B)  that protects against access to visual depictions that are:

(I)  child pornography; or

(II)  obscene; and

(ii)  is enforcing the operation of the technology protection measure described in Subsection (2)(b)(i) during any use of a computer.

(3)  This section does not prohibit a public library from limiting Internet access or otherwise protecting against materials other than the materials specified in this section.

(4)  An administrator, supervisor, or other representative of a public library may disable a technology protection measure described in Subsection (2):

(a)  at the request of a library patron who is not a minor; and

(b)  to enable access for research or other lawful purposes.

